src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_SUẸʹǨǨ
! gradation: yes
! weak geminate
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE  ẹ, ä
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! ** Yaml: __N-suekkj__
!!
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;		  !!(1) Sg.Nom: suẹʹǩǩ
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^KK2GG E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: suẹʼjj
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^KK2GG PL-NOM ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: suẹʼjj
:%^CC2CCC E-STEM_SG-ILL ;	      !!(3) Sg.Ill: suäkˈka
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^KK2GG%>e SG-LOC ; !!(4) Sg.Loc: suẹʹjjest
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; !!(6) Ess: suẹʹǩǩen
!+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^KK2GG%>e PAR ; !!(7) Par: suẹʹjjed
!2009: 204 +N:%^KK2GG%>e PAR ;

:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^KK2GG SG-COM_IN ; !!(5) Sg.Com: sueʹjjin
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^KK2GG E-STEM_PL-OBL ; !!(8) Pl.Acc: sueʹjjid
:%^KK2GG E-STEM_N_KUÂLAŽ ; !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: suäǥǥaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) suäkk-
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^Allegro%^PAL%^KK2G E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) suẹˈʹj-

LEXICON N_KUẸʹTT !!= * @CODE@ kuẹʹtt:kuätt
! vowel: diphthong
!! similar_to: N_SUẸʹǨǨ
+N: NMN_KUẸʹTT ;
LEXICON NMN_KUẸʹTT
! gradation: yes
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE  ẹ, ä
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! ** Yaml: __N-kuett__
!! * There are several stem types
!!
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! kuẹʹtt
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;		  	! kuẹʹtt
:%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;  	      			! kuäʹđ
:%^PAL%^CC2C PL-NOM ;  	      			! kuäʹđ
:%^CC2CCC E-STEM_SG-ILL ;				! kuätˈta
:%^PAL%^CC2C%>e SG-LOC ;			! kuäʹđest
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; 		! kuẹʹtten
!2009: 204 +N:%^CC2C%>e PAR ;	    		
:%^PAL%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ;			! kuäʹđin
:%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM_PL-OBL ;			! kuäʹđin
:%^CC2C E-STEM_N_KUÂLAŽ ;			! kuäđaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) kuätt-
:%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) kuẹʹđ-


LEXICON N_NUẸʹJJ !!= * @CODE@ nuẹʹjj:nuäjj
! vowel: diphthong
+N: NMN_NUẸʹJJ ;
LEXICON NMN_NUẸʹJJ
! gradation: yes
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE  ẹ, ä
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! ** Yaml: __N-nuejj__
!! similar_to: N_ǨIÕJJ, N_TUÂJJ, N_SUEʹJJ
!!
+Use/NG:%^PAL%^J2I%^CC2C SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;  	      	! nuäʹi
NMN_KUẸʹTT ;


LEXICON N_VUẸIʹVV !!= * @CODE@ vuẹiʹvv:vuäivv
! vowel: diphthong
+N: NMN_VUẸIʹVV ;
LEXICON NMN_VUẸIʹVV
! gradation: yes
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE  ẹ, ä
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! !!(1) Sg.Nom: vuẹiʹvv
!! !!(2) Pl.Nom: vuẹiʼv
!! !!(3) Sg.Ill: vuäivva
!! !!(4) Sg.Loc: vuẹiʹvest
!! !!(5) Sg.Com: vueiʹvin
!! !!(6) Ess: vuẹiʹvven
!! !!(7) Par: vuẹiʹvved
!! !!(8) Pl.Acc: vueiʹvid
!! !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: vuäivaž
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! ** Yaml: __N-vueivv__
!! * There are several stem types
!!
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! vuẹiʹvv
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;		  	! vuẹiʹvv
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		! vuẹiʹv
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY PL-NOM ;		! vuẹiʹv
: E-STEM_SG-ILL ;		       	      		! vuäivva
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY%>e SG-LOC ;	! vuẹiʹvest
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ;   	 	! vuẹiʹvven
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY SG-COM_IN ;	! vueiʹvin
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY E-STEM_PL-OBL ;	! vueiʹvin
:%^XYY2XY E-STEM_N_KUÂLAŽ ; 	      		! vuäiʹvaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) vuäivv-
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) vuẹiʹv-



LEXICON N_ČUÄʹRVV !!= * @CODE@ čuäʹrvv:čuärvv
! vowel: diphthong
+N: NMN_ČUÄʹRVV ;
LEXICON NMN_ČUÄʹRVV
! gradation: yes
! weak geminate
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE  ẹ, ä
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! !!(1) Sg.Nom: čuäʹrvv
!! !!(2) Pl.Nom: čuẹʼrv
!! !!(3) Sg.Ill: čuärvva
!! !!(4) Sg.Loc: čuẹʹrvest
!! !!(5) Sg.Com: čueʹrvin
!! !!(6) Ess: čuäʹrvven
!! !!(7) Par: čuäʹrvved
!! !!(8) Pl.Acc: čueʹrvid
!! !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: čuärvaž
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! ** Yaml: __N-chuaervv__
!! * There are several stem types
!!
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;			! čuäʹrvv
:%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;		  			! čuäʹrvv
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	! čuẹʼrv
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY PL-NOM ;	! čuẹʼrv
: E-STEM_SG-ILL ;	     			   	! čuärvva
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY%>e SG-LOC ;		! čuẹʼrvest
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; 	       			! čuäʼrvven
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY SG-COM_IN ;		! čueʼrvin
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY E-STEM_PL-OBL ;		! čueʼrvin
:%^XYY2XY E-STEM_N_KUÂLAŽ ;			! čuärvaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) čuärvv-
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) čuẹʹrv-

LEXICON N_NEUʹLL !!= * @CODE@ 
! vowel: monophthong
+N: NMN_NEUʹLL ;
