src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-INCOMING
alggpieʹll:algg#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
cennpieʹll:cenn#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
cieʹvv:ceävv N_KUẸʹTT ;
cuõʒʒpieʹll:cuõʒˈʒ#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
eʹččpieʹll:eʹčč#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
hirsskueʹtt:hirss#kuätt N_KUẸʹTT ;
hirsslueʹmm:hirss#luämm N_KUẸʹTT ;
jeänbieʹll:jeän#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
jeäʹnnbieʹll:jeäʹnn#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
jeäʹǩǩespieʹll:jeäʹǩǩes#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
jiõggjieʹtt:jiõgg#jiätt N_KUẸʹTT ;
jorbbvueiʹvv:jorbb#vuäivv N_VUẸIʹVV ;
jueʹlǧǧveuʹll:jueʹlǧǧveuʹll N_NEUʹLL ;
jõnn-neuʹll:jõnn-neuʹll N_NEUʹLL ;
kaarrbieʹll:kaarr#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
kaaʹffstueʹll:kaaʹff#stuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
kapusvueiʹvv:kapus#vuäivv N_VUẸIʹVV ;
koomčuäʹrvv:koomčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
koskkuumčuäʹrbieʹll:koskkuumčuäʹr#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
kueʹss-stueʹll:kueʹsˈs-#stuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
kueʹsselvueiʹvv:kueʹssel#vuäivv N_VUẸIʹVV ;
kupp-pieʹll:kupp-#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
kuppčuäʹrvv:kuppčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
kuärramvueʹrr:kuärram#vuärr N_KUẸʹTT ;
kuäʹccevkueʹtt:kuäʹcˈcev#kuätt N_KUẸʹTT ;
kuõbǯkueʹtt:kuõbǯ#kuätt N_KUẸʹTT ;
käʹǩstemveuʹll:käʹǩstemveuʹll N_NEUʹLL ;
kååvaspieʹll:kååvas#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
kååʹmeǩpieʹll:kååʹmeǩ#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
kõlbbčuäʹrvv:kõlbbčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
kõõččâmstueʹll:kõõččâm#stuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
laaukčuäʹrvv:laaukčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
leiʹnn-neuʹll:leiʹnn-neuʹll N_NEUʹLL ;
looppbieʹll:loopp#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
lueʹppčuäʹrvv:lueʹppčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
lueʹšttemstueʹll:lueʹšttem#stuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
luõzzvueiʹvv:luõzz#vuäivv N_VUẸIʹVV ;
lääʹddbieʹll:lääʹdd#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
lååʹddčuäʹrvv:lååʹddčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
maaʹjjikueʹtt:maaʹjji#kuätt N_KUẸʹTT ;
meiʹnnbieʹll:meiʹnn#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
miârrjieʹtt:miârr#jiätt N_KUẸʹTT ;
miõllpieʹll:miõll#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
mueʹrr:muärr N_KUẸʹTT ;
muäʹlǩǩčuäʹrvv:muäʹlǩǩčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
mueʹrr:muärr N_KUẸʹTT ;
mââibieʹll:mââi#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
mäddlueʹmm:mädd#luämm N_KUẸʹTT ;
nijddbieʹll:nijdd#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
njuhččâmčuäʹrvv:njuhččâmčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
njäiʹddčuäʹrvv:njäiʹddčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
njäʹlmmbieʹll:njäʹlmm#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
nueʹjj:nuäjj N_NUẸʹJJ ;
nuäʹrvv:nuäʹrvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
nuʹrccčuäʹrvv:nuʹrccčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
nääʹmmčuäʹrvv:nääʹmmčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
nääʹppčueʹll:nääʹpp#čuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
obbčueʹll:obb#čuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
oolǥbieʹll:oolǥ#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
ooudbieʹll:ooud#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
peddpieʹll:pedd#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
peʹsserneuʹll:peʹsserneuʹll N_NEUʹLL ;
pliâššvueiʹvv:pliâšˈš#vuäivv N_VUẸIʹVV ;
polddčuäʹrvv:poldd#čuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
poonnjâmǩieʹll:poonnjâm#ǩeäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
puhsspieʹll:puhss#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
puåttlõõttâmstueʹll:puåttlõõttâm#stuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
päʹǧǧčuäʹrvv:päʹǧǧčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
põttbieʹll:põtt#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
põttčueʹll:põtt#čuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
riõttpieʹll:riõtt#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
rooul-lueʹmm:rooul-#luämm N_KUẸʹTT ;
rueʹvv:ruävv N_KUẸʹTT ;
ruʹvddvueʹrr:ruʹvdd#vuärr N_KUẸʹTT ;
râʹddvueiʹvv:râʹdd#vuäivv N_VUẸIʹVV ;
seeʹlljčuäʹrvv:seeʹlljčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
seiʹnnkueʹtt:seiʹnn#kuätt N_KUẸʹTT ;
siiʹsǩpieʹll:siiʹsǩ#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
siõjjkueʹtt:siõjj#kuätt N_KUẸʹTT ;
solggpieʹll:solgg#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
sooǥǥbieʹll:sooǥǥ#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
suõvv-vueiʹvv:suõvv-#vuäivv N_VUẸIʹVV ;
sõõrneckueʹtt:sõõrnec#kuätt N_KUẸʹTT ;
sõõrvčuäʹrvv:sõõrvčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
taalâspieʹll:taalâs#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
tobddâmčuäʹrvv:tobddâmčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
toppčuäʹrvv:toppčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
tueʹllnuäʹrvv:tueʹllnuäʹrvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
turrvueiʹvv:turr#vuäivv N_VUẸIʹVV ;
tuâǥǥbieʹll:tuâǥǥ#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
tâʹvvpieʹll:tâʹvv#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
täälkueʹtt:tääl#kuätt N_KUẸʹTT ;
täʹhttneuʹll:täʹhttneuʹll N_NEUʹLL ;
täʹhttvueʹrr:täʹhtt#vuärr N_KUẸʹTT ;
usspieʹll:uss#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
vaarpâlpieʹll:vaarpâl#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
vaccpieʹll:vacc#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
valddtõk-kueʹtt:valddtõk-#kuätt N_KUẸʹTT ;
veiʹnnčueʹll:veiʹnn#čuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
veuʹll:veuʹll N_NEUʹLL ;
vivvbieʹll:vivv#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
viʹlljbieʹll:viʹllj#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
viʹlljpieʹll:viʹllj#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
vueiʹnnlõõttâmstueʹll:vueiʹnnlõõttâm#stuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
vueiʹvvneuʹll:vueiʹvvneuʹll N_NEUʹLL ;
vueʹllpieʹll:vueʹll#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
vueʹrnnbieʹll:vueʹrnn#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
vueʹrr:vuärr N_KUẸʹTT ;
vueʹtǩǩemčuäʹrvv:vueʹtǩǩemčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
vuâstbieʹll:vuâst#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
vueʹssbieʹll:vuẹʹss#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
vuäʹljesbieʹll:vuäʹljes#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
vuäʹlǧǧveuʹll:vuäʹlǧǧveuʹll N_NEUʹLL ;
vuõmmbieʹll:vuõmm#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
âʹlǧǧpieʹll:âʹlǧǧ#peäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
åålǥbieʹll:åålǥ#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
čeuʹččvueiʹvv:čeuʹčč#vuäivv N_VUẸIʹVV ;
čiʹǯsbieʹll:čiʹǯs#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
čokkčuäʹrvv:čokkčuärvv N_ČUÄʹRVV ;
čuâǥsbieʹll:čuâǥs#beäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
čuâǥsvueiʹvv:čuâǥs#vuäivv N_VUẸIʹVV ;
čuõppâmstueʹll:čuõppâm#stuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
čâustõkveuʹll:čâustõkveuʹll N_NEUʹLL ;
čääʹʒʒvueiʹvv:čääʹʒʒ#vuäivv N_VUẸIʹVV ;
čõõnnâmstueʹll:čõõnnâm#stuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
ǩeäʹdǧǧlueʹmm:ǩeäʹdǧǧ#luämm N_KUẸʹTT ;
ǩiõttväʹlddemstueʹll:ǩiõtt#väʹlddem#stuäll N_KUẸʹTT ;
